Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorizationdeleted text begin ; scopedeleted text end . (a) A political subdivision of this state may impose a general sales taxnew text begin :new text end (1)new text begin under section 297A.9901;new text end new text begin (2)new text end under section 297A.9915deleted text begin , (2)deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3)new text end under section 297A.992deleted text begin , (3)deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4)new text end under section 297A.9925deleted text begin , (4)deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5)new text end under section 297A.993deleted text begin , (5)deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6)new text end if permitted by special lawdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end if the political subdivision enacted and imposed the tax before January 1, 1982, and its predecessor provision. (b) This section governs the imposition of a general sales tax by the political subdivision. The provisions of this section preempt the provisions of any special law: (1) enacted before June 2, 1997deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or (2) enacted on or after June 2, 1997,new text begin and before July 1, 2025,new text end that does not explicitly exempt the special law provision from this section's rules by reference. (c) This section does not apply to or preempt a sales tax on motor vehicles. Beginning July 1, 2019, no political subdivision may impose a special excise tax on motor vehicles unless it is imposed under section 297A.993. (d) A political subdivision may not advertise or expend funds for the promotion of a referendum to support imposing a local sales tax and may only spend funds related to imposing a local sales tax to: (1) conduct the referendum; (2) disseminate information included in the resolution adopted under subdivision 2, but only if the disseminated information includes a list of specific projects and the cost of each individual project; (3) provide notice of, and conduct public forums at which proponents and opponents on the merits of the referendum are given equal time to express their opinions on the merits of the referendum; (4) provide facts and data on the impact of the proposed local sales tax on consumer purchases; and (5) provide facts and data related to the individual programs and projects to be funded with the local sales tax. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin The provisions of this section only apply to a tax imposed and enacted by special law. A political subdivision seeking to amend, extend, or otherwise change a tax imposed and enacted before July 1, 2025, must do so pursuant to the requirements of section 297A.9901. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Legislative authority required before voter approval; requirements for adoption, use, termination. (a) A political subdivision must receive legislative authority to impose a local sales tax before submitting the tax for approval by voters of the political subdivision. Imposition of a local sales tax is subject to approval by voters of the political subdivision at a general election. The election must be conducted at a general election within the two-year period after the governing body of the political subdivision has received authority to impose the tax. If the authorizing legislation allows the tax to be imposed for more than one project, there must be a separate question approving the use of the tax revenue for each project. Notwithstanding the authorizing legislation, a project that is not approved by the voters may not be funded with the local sales tax revenue and the termination date of the tax set in the authorizing legislation must be reduced proportionately based on the share of that project's cost to the total costs of all projects included in the authorizing legislation. (b) The proceeds of the tax must be dedicated exclusively to payment of the construction and rehabilitation costs and associated bonding costs related to the specific capital improvement projects that were approved by the voters under paragraph (a). (c) The tax must terminate after the revenues raised are sufficient to fund the projects approved by the voters under paragraph (a). (d) After a sales tax imposed by a political subdivision has expired or been terminated, the political subdivision is prohibited from imposing a local sales tax for a period of one year. (e) deleted text begin Notwithstanding paragraph (a), if a political subdivision received voter approval to seek authority for a local sales tax at the November 6, 2018, general election and is granted authority to impose a local sales tax before January 1, 2021, the tax may be imposed without an additional referendum provided that it meets the requirements of subdivision 2 and the list of specific projects contained in the resolution does not conflict with the projects listed in the approving referendum.deleted text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2026, the annual financial reporting requirements under section 297A.9902, subdivision 2, apply to taxes authorized under special law or under this section.new text end (f) If a tax is terminated because sufficient revenues have been raised, any amount of tax collected under subdivision 9, after sufficient revenues have been raised and before the quarterly termination required under subdivision 12, paragraph (a), that is greater than the average quarterly revenues collected over the immediately preceding 12 calendar months must be retained by the commissioner for deposit in the general fund. new text begin (g) A political subdivision that receives special law authority to impose a tax must file a certificate of local approval with the secretary of state in accordance with section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. If the tax is approved by the voters, the political subdivision must impose the tax within 15 months of receiving voter approval. If the tax is not imposed within 15 months, the special law authority to impose the tax expires. new text end new text begin (h) Upon expiration of a tax authorized under this section or any other law, ordinance, or city charter, the combined tax rate limit in section 297A.9901, subdivision 7, applies. new text end new text begin (i) If, after receiving voter approval, a political subdivision cancels a project approved by the voters, the political subdivision must notify the commissioner. The commissioner must proportionately decrease the maximum amount of tax revenue the political subdivision may collect and must adjust the termination of the tax accordingly. If the political subdivision has already collected revenue for the canceled project, the political subdivision must return the money to the commissioner to be added to the local sales tax equalization account for the political subdivision's contribution share in accordance with section 297A.9903. The political subdivision must use any other source of revenue available to pay any outstanding debt on the bonds that were issued for the canceled project. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [297A.9901] LOCAL SALES TAXES; LOCAL AUTHORIZATION ALLOWED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Associated bonding costs" means the costs of issuing bonds to finance a specified capital project, including but not limited to the costs of issuing the bonds, capitalized interest, and paying principal and interest on the bonds. new text end new text begin (c) "Community center" means a structure that is expressly designed and constructed for the purposes of recreational, cultural, educational, or public group activities, or for civic engagement or social support, that serves residents and nonresidents of the community. new text end new text begin (d) "Convention center" means a structure that is expressly designed and constructed for the purpose of presenting conventions, public meetings, and exhibitions, and that contains at least 50,000 square feet for exhibit and meeting spaces and includes parking facilities that serve the center. new text end new text begin (e) "District court" means one of the ten judicial district courts in Minnesota subject to chapter 484. new text end new text begin (f) "General election" has the meaning given in section 200.02. new text end new text begin (g) "Law enforcement center" means a facility that serves multiple communities and provides public safety functions, including a fire or police station and a facility that provides emergency 911 and dispatch functions, training facilities, court security and support, emergency operations, evidence and record retention, and other public safety services. Law enforcement center does not include correctional facilities licensed under section 241.021. new text end new text begin (h) "Library" means a library that is part of a regional public library system established under section 134.20. new text end new text begin (i) "Metropolitan county" has the meaning given in section 473.121, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (j) "Park" means an area of regional significance that contains natural, seminatural, or planted space set aside for public recreation and enjoyment or for the protection of wildlife or natural habitats. new text end new text begin (k) "Political subdivision" means a county or a statutory or home rule charter city located in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (l) "Special election" has the meaning given in section 200.02, except that a special election held under this section must be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. new text end new text begin (m) "Specified capital project" means a community center, convention center, district court, law enforcement center, library, park, sports complex, or trail. A specified capital project must serve a regional population, provide economic development benefits and opportunities, or draw nonresident individuals to the region. new text end new text begin (n) "Sports complex" means a defined area of sports pavilions, stadiums, gymnasiums, swimming pools, or similar facilities where regional tournaments may be hosted and where members of the public engage in physical exercise, participate in athletic competitions, attend sporting events, and host regional tournaments. Sports complex does not include venues in which a professional sports team competing in Major League Baseball, Major League Soccer, the National Basketball Association, the Women's National Basketball Association, the National Football League, or the National Hockey League competes in games, competitions, training, or practices. new text end new text begin (o) "Trail" means a path or track that passes through a natural area and that serves a destination, provides recreational opportunities, and draws a regional population. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Local authorization allowed. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 477A.016 or any other law or ordinance, a political subdivision may impose, extend, or modify the uses of a local sales tax to finance a specified capital project by: (1) meeting the requirements of this section; (2) receiving approval from the commissioner; and (3) receiving voter approval. The authorization under this section applies to an extension to or modification of a local sales tax authorized under special law or the requirements of section 297A.99, or any other law, ordinance, city charter, or other provision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Use of proceeds. new text end new text begin The proceeds of a tax imposed under this section must be dedicated exclusively to paying construction or rehabilitation costs, including associated bonding costs, related to the specified capital projects approved by the voters. A political subdivision may use the proceeds of a tax to fund not more than three specified capital projects. Specified capital projects must meet the requirements in subdivisions 1 and 4 to 6. The political subdivision imposing the tax must not commingle revenue from a tax approved by the voters under this section with revenue from a tax authorized under section 297A.99, or any other law, ordinance, city charter, or other provision, including an extension of or modification to the uses of a tax for a different project. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Sports complexes, community centers, and convention centers; additional requirements. new text end new text begin (a) To impose a tax to fund the construction or rehabilitation of a community center, sports complex, or convention center, a political subdivision must: new text end new text begin (1) perform an analysis of the surrounding region that demonstrates there is no similar sports complex, community center, or convention center open to nonresidents at the same cost as residents within a 15-mile radius of the political subdivision for political subdivisions located outside of a metropolitan county and within an eight-mile radius of the political subdivision for political subdivisions located within a metropolitan county; and new text end new text begin (2) equally charge residents and nonresidents of the political subdivision imposing the tax for the use of the facility, if members of the public are charged an admission or entry fee for use of the facility. new text end new text begin (b) The political subdivision must submit documentation of the requirements of paragraph (a) to the commissioner pursuant to the requirements of section 297A.9902, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin District courts; law enforcement centers; additional requirements. new text end new text begin (a) To impose a tax to fund construction or rehabilitation of or improvements to a district court office, a political subdivision must demonstrate the need for the facility by providing the age of the facility and a description of improvements needed. new text end new text begin (b) To impose a tax to fund construction or rehabilitation of or improvements to a law enforcement center, a political subdivision must provide resolutions from the governing bodies of surrounding counties, statutory or home rule charter cities, or townships affirming that the functions of the law enforcement center will meet the needs of the surrounding county, statutory or home rule charter city, or township. The resolutions must be submitted to the commissioner as part of the documentation filed under section 297A.9902, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) The political subdivision must submit documentation of the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) to the commissioner pursuant to the requirements of section 297A.9902, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Parks and trails; additional requirements. new text end new text begin (a) To impose a tax to fund the construction or rehabilitation of or improvements to a park, a political subdivision must demonstrate that the park: new text end new text begin (1) provides a natural resource-based setting, outdoor recreation facilities, and multiple activities that are primarily natural resource based; new text end new text begin (2) occupies at least 100 acres of land; new text end new text begin (3) is utilized by a regional population; and new text end new text begin (4) includes unique natural, historic, or cultural features or characteristics. new text end new text begin (b) To impose a tax to fund the construction or rehabilitation of or improvements to a trail, a political subdivision must demonstrate that the trail: new text end new text begin (1) serves more than a local population and encompasses multiple jurisdictions; and new text end new text begin (2) connects to existing or planned state or regional parks or trails. new text end new text begin (c) The political subdivision must submit documentation of the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) to the commissioner pursuant to the requirements of section 297A.9902, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (d) In determining whether the proposed park or trail meets the criteria established in paragraphs (a) and (b), the commissioner may consult examples and guidance contained in the Department of Natural Resources Parks and Trails Legacy Plan dated February 14, 2011. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Tax rate and duration. new text end new text begin (a) The combined total tax rate imposed by a political subdivision under this section and section 297A.99 must not exceed one-half of one percent. If a local sales tax is imposed by a county, the limit under this paragraph excludes any tax authorized under section 297A.993. new text end new text begin (b) The maximum collection period for a tax imposed under this section is the lesser of the amount of time necessary to collect the revenue equal to the cost of the specified capital projects approved by the voters, including associated financing costs, or 30 years. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Bonds; authorization. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision may issue bonds under chapter 475 to finance all or a portion of the costs of a specified capital project. The aggregate principal amount of bonds issued must not exceed the cost of a qualifying capital project approved by the voters, plus an amount to be applied to the payment of the costs of issuing the bonds, including interest. The bonds may be paid from or secured by any funds available to the political subdivision, including the tax authorized under this section and approved by the voters. The issuance of bonds under this subdivision is not subject to sections 275.60 and 275.61. new text end new text begin (b) A separate election to approve the bonds under section 475.58 is not required. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Public hearing required. new text end new text begin (a) Prior to seeking authority to impose a tax under this section, a political subdivision must hold at least one public hearing that is open to residents and nonresidents. The public hearing must allow equal time for proponents and opponents to express their opinions on the imposition of the tax. The political subdivision must provide at least 30 days' notice of the public hearing and must publish the notice on the political subdivision's website. The notice must identify the time and location of the hearing and contain the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the proposed tax rate; new text end new text begin (2) a description of each project proposed to be funded by the local sales tax; and new text end new text begin (3) the amount of tax revenue to be used for each project and the estimated time needed to raise that amount of revenue, inclusive of the estimated amount distributed under subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (b) The public must be allowed to speak at the hearing required under paragraph (a). The hearing must not be held before 6:00 p.m. The political subdivision must provide a website and a telephone number for the political subdivision that members of the public may call with questions related to the notice and an address where comments will be received by mail. The notice required under this subdivision does not require the printing of a personal telephone number or mailing address as the contact information for a political subdivision. If a political subdivision does not maintain a website or public offices where telephone calls can be received by the political subdivision, the notice of the hearing required under paragraph (a) must indicate that the political subdivision does not maintain a website or public offices where telephone calls can be received by the political subdivision. new text end new text begin (c) The political subdivision must submit the minutes from this hearing to the commissioner when requesting approval of the tax pursuant to the provisions of section 297A.9902, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Resolution required. new text end new text begin (a) After conducting the public hearing required under subdivision 9 and before the governing body of a political subdivision seeks voter approval to impose a local sales tax, the governing body must adopt a resolution indicating its approval of the tax. The resolution must include: new text end new text begin (1) the proposed tax rate; new text end new text begin (2) a detailed description of no more than three projects that will be funded with revenue from the tax; new text end new text begin (3) documentation of the regional significance of each specified capital project, including: new text end new text begin (i) the share of the economic benefit to or use of each project by persons residing, or businesses located, outside of the jurisdiction; and new text end new text begin (ii) demonstration that the project meets the requirements of the applicable definitions in subdivision 1, as well as the requirements of subdivisions 4 to 6; new text end new text begin (4) the amount of local sales tax revenue that will be used for each project and the estimated time needed to raise that amount of revenue; and new text end new text begin (5) the total revenue that will be raised for all projects before the tax expires and the estimated length of time that the tax will be in effect if all proposed projects are funded. new text end new text begin (b) The political subdivision must submit the resolution along with underlying documentation to the commissioner pursuant to the provisions of section 297A.9902, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Community support required. new text end new text begin Prior to seeking authority to impose a tax under this section, a political subdivision must provide to the commissioner letters or resolutions from the governing bodies of at least two surrounding local governments that affirmatively acknowledge that there is a local or regional need for the proposed specified capital project. Documentation must be submitted to the commissioner as required by section 297A.9902, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Voter approval required. new text end new text begin (a) A local sales tax approved by the commissioner is subject to voter approval prior to being imposed. A referendum conducted under this section must meet the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) the referendum must be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November at a general or special election, so long as the ballot question for approval of the tax is not the only item on the ballot, within the two-year period after the political subdivision has received authority to impose the tax; new text end new text begin (2) the ballot language must contain the following information: new text end new text begin (i) a description of each specified capital project that will be funded by the tax; new text end new text begin (ii) the projected start date of the tax; new text end new text begin (iii) the proposed tax rate; new text end new text begin (iv) the cost of the project, including associated bonding costs; new text end new text begin (v) the maximum amount of time the tax will be imposed; new text end new text begin (vi) acknowledgment that the total project cost may increase by up to a certain percent and the duration of imposition of the tax may increase by up to a number of years as the allowance for inflation authorized under subdivision 18; new text end new text begin (vii) a statement that a portion of the tax revenue will be used for the political subdivision's contributions according to the revenue sharing requirement in subdivision 17; and new text end new text begin (viii) a statement that an affirmative vote means that a new tax will be imposed or that an existing tax will be extended or increased; new text end new text begin (3) the ballot language must not contain any statement that informs the voter that by voting "no" the voter acknowledges that the project subject to approval in the question may be funded by increased property taxes; and new text end new text begin (4) each project must be a separate ballot question if a political subdivision is seeking voter approval for more than one project. new text end new text begin (b) A project that is not approved by the voters may not be funded with the tax revenue and the termination date of the tax approved by the commissioner must be reduced proportionately based on the share of that project's cost to the total costs of all projects. new text end new text begin (c) A political subdivision may not advertise or expend money for the promotion of a referendum to support imposing a tax and may only spend money related to: new text end new text begin (1) conducting the referendum; new text end new text begin (2) disseminating information regarding the projects to be funded with the tax; new text end new text begin (3) providing notice of and conducting public forums at which proponents and opponents of the referendum are given equal time to express their opinions on the merits of the referendum; and new text end new text begin (4) providing facts and data on the impact of the proposed local sales tax on consumer purchases. new text end new text begin (d) The political subdivision must submit the language of each ballot question to the commissioner for approval prior to printing the ballot for use in a referendum. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Legislative approval required. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision seeking to impose a tax must obtain legislative approval to impose the tax if the tax does not meet the requirements of this section or if the commissioner does not approve the proposal submitted for imposition of the tax. The provisions of section 297A.99 apply to any tax imposed by special law. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the requirements imposed under section 297A.99, subdivision 2, the political subdivision must include in its resolution submitted to the legislature: new text end new text begin (1) a detailed description of how the request does not meet the requirements of this section; and new text end new text begin (2) letters or resolutions from the governing bodies of each local government located in Minnesota that abuts the political subdivision that affirmatively acknowledge that there is a local or regional need for the proposed capital project. new text end new text begin (c) A tax approved by the legislature is subject to the collection and retention provisions of subdivision 17 and sections 297A.9902, subdivisions 2 and 3, and 297A.9903. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Filing and imposition requirements. new text end new text begin A political subdivision that receives approval from the commissioner to impose a tax under this section must file a certificate of local approval with the secretary of state within 60 days after receiving voter approval for the tax to be lawfully imposed. If the tax is approved by the voters, the political subdivision must impose the tax within 15 months of receiving voter approval. If the tax is not imposed within 15 months, the authority to impose the tax under this section expires. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Administration; termination. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision imposing a tax under this section must not commingle revenue from a tax for a project or projects approved by the voters under this section with revenue from a tax authorized under section 297A.99 or any other law, ordinance, city charter, or other provision, including an extension of or modification to the uses of a tax for a different project. new text end new text begin (b) A political subdivision imposing a tax under this section must notify the commissioner at least 90 days before the date the political subdivision anticipates that revenues raised from the tax are sufficient to fund the project or projects approved by the voters. The notification applies to each authorization of a tax and each project approved by the voters, regardless of whether the legislature has authorized the tax, notwithstanding the requirements of section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (c) After a tax imposed under this section by a political subdivision has expired or been terminated, the political subdivision is prohibited from imposing a new local sales tax for a period of one year. new text end new text begin (d) If a tax is terminated because sufficient revenues have been raised, any amount of tax collected after sufficient revenues have been raised and before the quarterly termination required under section 297A.99, subdivision 12, paragraph (a), that is greater than the average quarterly revenues collected over the immediately preceding 12 calendar months, must be retained by the commissioner for deposit in the general fund. new text end new text begin (e) If, after receiving voter approval, a political subdivision cancels a project approved by the voters, the political subdivision must notify the commissioner. The commissioner must proportionately decrease the maximum amount of tax revenue the political subdivision may collect and must adjust the termination of the tax accordingly. If the political subdivision has already collected revenue for the canceled project, the political subdivision must return the money to the commissioner to be added to the local sales tax equalization account for the political subdivision's contribution share in accordance with subdivision 17 and section 297A.9903. The political subdivision must use any other source of revenue available to pay any outstanding debt on the bonds that were issued for the canceled project. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Collection and retention. new text end new text begin The commissioner must remit the proceeds of the tax, less refunds and a proportionate share described in clauses (1) and (2), at least quarterly, to the political subdivision. The commissioner must deduct from the proceeds distributed to a political subdivision an amount that equals: new text end new text begin (1) one percent for the direct and indirect costs of the department to administer, audit, and collect the tax, of which a portion must be used for the cost of constructing and maintaining a zip code or geocode database necessary for local sales tax collections under the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement in section 297A.995 to be deposited into the Revenue Department service and recovery special revenue fund established under section 270C.15; and new text end new text begin (2) the political subdivision's contribution share of the amount to be paid under subdivision 17 and section 297A.9903 to be deposited into the local sales tax equalization distribution account. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Revenue sharing required. new text end new text begin A political subdivision imposing a tax under this section is subject to the revenue sharing requirements of section 297A.9903. The amount of tax that the commissioner must retain under subdivision 16, clause (2), is equal to: new text end new text begin (1) 15 percent for a political subdivision whose tax is authorized and imposed under this section; new text end new text begin (2) 15 percent for a political subdivision that amends, extends, or otherwise modifies a tax that was authorized and imposed by special law before July 1, 2025; or new text end new text begin (3) 20 percent for a political subdivision that is authorized by special law to impose a new tax after July 1, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Allowance for inflation. new text end new text begin (a) Before the expiration of the 15-month period under subdivision 14, a political subdivision may increase the amount approved by the voters to finance the specified capital project or increase the amount of time the tax may be imposed as approved by the voters to collect revenues sufficient to fund the specified capital project, or both. new text end new text begin (b) The total cost of the specified project as approved by the voters may be increased by the greater of: new text end new text begin (1) ten percent; or new text end new text begin (2) ten percent plus the rate of change in inflation according to the Producer Price Index for New Nonresidential Building Construction published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for the period beginning the month and calendar year in which the political subdivision submits documentation to the commissioner under section 297A.9902, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), and ending the month and calendar year in which the tax is approved by voters under subdivision 12. new text end new text begin (c) A political subdivision exercising the options under paragraphs (a) and (b) must adopt a resolution documenting the need for the increase in project cost or duration of imposition of the tax, or both. The political subdivision must file the resolution with the commissioner within ten days of adopting the resolution, but not after the 15-month period under subdivision 14 has expired. A political subdivision may not extend the duration of the tax beyond 30 years. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Account established. new text end new text begin The local sales tax equalization distribution account is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account must be distributed in accordance with section 297A.9903. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Other provisions apply. new text end new text begin (a) The provisions of section 297A.99, subdivisions 4 to 10 and 12 to 13, apply to taxes authorized under this section. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements of section 475.53 apply to bonds issued for projects under this section. new text end new text begin (c) All contracts for construction of specified capital projects under this section are subject to the requirements and enforcement provisions of sections 177.27, 177.30, 177.32, 177.41 to 177.435, 177.44, and 177.45. For purposes of complying with section 177.30, paragraph (a), clauses (6) and (7), and sections 177.41 to 177.435, the political subdivision imposing the tax is the contracting authority and contracting agency and the project is considered a public works project. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [297A.9902] LOCAL SALES TAXES; VERIFICATION AND OVERSIGHT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Filing requirement. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision seeking to impose a local sales tax under section 297A.9901 must file a copy of all documentation required under section 297A.9901 with the commissioner. A political subdivision may file documentation at any point during the year, but only documentation filed by October 31 is required to receive a determination from the commissioner by January 10 of the following year. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must verify whether each project included in the submission under paragraph (a) meets the requirements of section 297A.9901. The commissioner must notify the political subdivision of the commissioner's determination within 60 days of receiving the submission under paragraph (a). Any political subdivision that files its submission by October 31 must receive the commissioner's determination by January 10 of the following year. If the commissioner determines that a project does not meet the requirements of section 297A.9901, the political subdivision may seek legislative authorization for a local sales tax to finance the project under the provisions of section 297A.99. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Annual financial reporting. new text end new text begin By January 31 of each odd-numbered year, a political subdivision imposing a local sales tax pursuant to section 297A.99 or 297A.9901, under special law, or by city charter or ordinance must submit information regarding the uses of the local sales tax to the commissioner. The information must be submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner or the commissioner's designees may examine records of a political subdivision to complete or verify the provided information. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The commissioner must notify the governing body of the political subdivision if the commissioner determines a political subdivision has not provided the information required by subdivision 2; is not in compliance with the required use of proceeds of the local sales tax as provided by section 297A.9901, subdivision 3, as approved by the voters; or is not in compliance with any use of proceeds requirements as required by a special law as approved by the voters. The governing body of the political subdivision must respond in writing to the commissioner within 60 days after receiving the notification. The written response must state whether the political subdivision accepts in whole or in part the commissioner's findings. If the political subdivision does not accept the findings, the statement must indicate the basis for disagreement. If the political subdivision does not take corrective measures within 60 days of receipt of notice of noncompliance, the commissioner must expire the tax. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By February 15 each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over taxes summarizing the information provided by political subdivisions in the preceding year under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [297A.9903] LOCAL SALES TAX EQUALIZATION DISTRIBUTIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Adjusted net tax capacity" means the qualified recipient's adjusted net tax capacity under section 273.1325. new text end new text begin (c) "Average fiscal capacity" means the sum of the adjusted net tax capacities of all qualified recipients in a city sharing pool or county sharing pool, divided by the population of all cities in the city sharing pool or all counties in the county sharing pool. new text end new text begin (d) "City sharing pool" means all cities located within the same economic development region. For purposes of this section, when a city is located within more than one economic development region it is deemed to be located in the economic development region with the highest share of the city's adjusted net tax capacity. new text end new text begin (e) "Contribution share" means the percentage of the total local sales taxes that were retained pursuant to section 297A.9901, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (f) "Contributor" means a political subdivision that: new text end new text begin (1) authorizes and imposes a local sales tax under section 297A.9901; new text end new text begin (2) amends, extends, or otherwise modifies a local sales tax that was authorized before July 1, 2025; or new text end new text begin (3) is authorized by special law to impose a new local sales tax after June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin (g) "County sharing pool" means all counties located within the same economic development region. new text end new text begin (h) "Distribution index" means, for a qualified recipient, the product of: (1) its population; and (2) the proportion that the average fiscal capacity in the preceding year bears to the fiscal capacity of the qualified recipient for the preceding year. new text end new text begin (i) "Distribution share" for a qualified recipient means the product of: new text end new text begin (1) the contributor's contribution share available for distribution under subdivision 4 to a city sharing pool or county sharing pool; and new text end new text begin (2) the proportion that the distribution index for the qualified recipient bears to the sum of the distribution indices of all qualified recipients in the city sharing pool or county sharing pool. new text end new text begin (j) "Economic development region" means the regions defined in section 462.385, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (k) "Fiscal capacity" of a qualified recipient means its adjusted net tax capacity divided by its population. new text end new text begin (l) "Local sales tax" means: new text end new text begin (1) a local sales tax imposed under section 297A.9901; or new text end new text begin (2) a local sales tax imposed under section 297A.99 or special law that was enacted or modified after June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin (m) "Political subdivision" means a political subdivision as defined in section 297A.9901, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (n) "Population" means the population estimated or established as of January 1 in the year distributions under this section are calculated by the most recent federal census, by a special census conducted under contract with the United States Bureau of the Census, or by a population estimate of the state demographer made pursuant to section 4A.02, whichever is the most recent. new text end new text begin (o) "Qualified recipient" means a political subdivision that: new text end new text begin (1) does not meet the definition of contributor; new text end new text begin (2) did not collect a local sales tax in the prior calendar year that was approved by voters prior to July 1, 2025; and new text end new text begin (3) is: new text end new text begin (i) a city that is located in the same economic development region as a city included in the definition of a contributor in the prior calendar year; or new text end new text begin (ii) a county that is located in the same economic development region as a county included in the definition of a contributor in the prior calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Local sales tax revenue sharing required. new text end new text begin A political subdivision with a local sales tax is subject to the contribution requirements under subdivision 3 for any calendar year, or portion thereof, in which a local sales tax is collected. All qualified recipients are eligible for distributions under this section, and the commissioner must annually calculate each qualified recipient's distribution share. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Contribution share. new text end new text begin Pursuant to section 297A.9901, subdivision 17, the commissioner must annually retain each political subdivision's contribution share. For any calendar year in which a political subdivision does not collect a local sales tax, the political subdivision's contribution share is $0. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Final distribution. new text end new text begin The commissioner must divide each contributor's contribution share among all qualified recipients in the contributor's city sharing pool or county sharing pool according to each qualified recipient's distribution share. If a city sharing pool or county sharing pool has no qualified recipients, then the contribution share for that sharing pool must be divided among all other city sharing pools and county sharing pools, in proportion to the contribution share available in each. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Certification and settlement. new text end new text begin The commissioner must annually calculate and certify each contributor's contribution share and each qualified recipient's final distribution, based on local sales taxes collected in the prior calendar year. The commissioner must provide notice of the certification to each contributor and qualified recipient by January 31. By March 15 annually, the commissioner must pay to each qualified recipient the distribution share certified under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to make distributions under this section is appropriated from the local sales tax equalization distribution account established under section 297A.9901, subdivision 19, to the commissioner. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.99, subdivision 3a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04981 297A.99 LOCAL SALES TAXES. Subd. 3a. Temporary moratorium. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1, 2, and 3, until after May 31, 2025, a political subdivision may not engage in any of the following activities in connection with imposing a new local sales and use tax or modifying an existing local sales and use tax: (1) any activity described in subdivision 1, paragraph (d); (2) adopt a resolution; or (3) seek voter approval. (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to new local sales and use taxes or modifications to existing local sales and use taxes authorized in May, 2023. (c) This subdivision expires June 1, 2025.